zh-TW: 帶端配件類型: 珠形; 支架; 帶扣; 登山扣; D 形環; 雞眼套片; 金屬扣眼; 魔鬼氈貼片; 圈環; 無需安裝; 板; S 形鉤; 扣環鉤; 其他
fi: Hihnan päätykiinnitystyyppi: Helmi; Kiinnike; Solki; Karabiini; D-rengas; Rengasniitti; Purjerengas; Tarranauhakiinnitys; Lenkki; Ei sovitusta; Levy; S-koukku; Karabiinikoukku; Muu
es: Tipo de accesorio del extremo de la correa: Cuentas y abalorios; Soporte; Hebilla; Mosquetón; Anillo en D; Ojal para manualidades; Ojal; Pestaña de velcro; Bucle; Sin ajuste; Placa; Gancho en forma de S; Mosquetón; Otros
de: Befestigungselement am Gurtende: Perle; Halterung; Schnalle; Karabiner; D-Ring; Öse; Öse; Klettverschluss; Schlinge; Keine Passform; Platte; S-Haken; Karabinerhaken; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tipul de fixare al capătului curelei: Mărgea; Suport; Cataramă; Carabinieră; Inel tip D; Ochi; Ochi metalic; Lavetă arici; Buclă; Fără accesoriu; Placă; Cârlig tip S; Cârlig cu închidere rapidă; Altele
vi: Loại đầu nối dây đeo: Hạt cườm; Giá đỡ; Kẹp; Móc khóa đa năng; Khoen chữ D; Lỗ xâu; Vòng đệm; Miếng dán xé; Vòng; Không có đầu nối; Tấm lắp; Móc chữ S; Móc khóa; Khác
fr: Type d’embout de sangle: Perle; Équerre; Boucle; Mousqueton; Anneau en D; Œillet; Passe-fil; Patte auto-agrippante; Bouclé; Sans embout; Plaque; Crochet en S; Mousqueton; Autre
nb: Type endemontering av stropp: Perle; Brakett; Spenne; Karabinkrok; D-ring; Liten malje; Malje; Borrelåsfane; Løkke; Ingen montering; Tallerken; S-krok; Karabinkrok; Annet
it: Tipo di raccordo terminale della cinghia: Perlina; Staffa; Fibbia; Moschettone; Anello a D; Occhiello; Occhiello; Linguetta in velcro; Nodo; Nessun montaggio; Piastra; Gancio a S; Moschettone; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de encaixe da extremidade da correia: Conta; Braçadeira; Fivela; Mosquetão; Anel em D; Ilhó; Ilhó; Patilha de gancho e laço; Laço; Sem ajuste; Placa; Gancho em S; Mosquetão; Outro
ko: 스트랩 끝단 피팅 유형: 비드; 브래킷; 버클; 카라비너; D링; 아일릿; 그로밋; 벨크로 탭; 루프 고리; 피팅 없음; 플레이트; S-후크; 스냅 후크; 기타
da: Stropendes beslagtype: Perle; Beslag; Spænde; Karabinhage; D-ring; Øje; Strop; Hook-and-loop-strop; Løkke; Ingen montering; Tallerken; S-krog; Karabinhage; Andet
cs: Typ zakončení popruhu: Korálek; Úchytka; Přezka; Karabina; D-kroužek; Očko; Průchodka; Poutko se suchým zipem; Stahovací (smyčka); Bez zakončení; Deska; S-háček; Karabina; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип накрайник на лента: С мънисто; Скоба; Катарама; Карабинер; D–образна халка; Малка капса; Капса; Лепяща лента с кука; Примка; Без накрайник; Планка; S-образна кука; Карабина; Друго
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ยึดปลายสายรัด: ลูกปัด; เหล็กฉาก; หัวเข็มขัด; คาราบิเนอร์; วงแหวนรูปตัว D; ตาไก่; ตาไก่; แถบตีนตุ๊กแก; ห่วง; ไม่มีการเชื่อมต่อ; แผ่น; ตะขอรูปตัว S; ตะขอสแนป; อื่นๆ
ja: ストラップエンドのフィッティングタイプ: ビード; ブラケット; バックル; カラビナ; D型リング; アイレット; グロメット; フックとループタブ; ループ; フィッティングなし; プレート; S字フック; スナップフック; その他
hu: Pántvég illesztési típusa: Golyó; Konzol; Csat; Karabiner; D-gyűrű; Szem; Fűzőkarika; Tépőzáras fül; Hurok; Nincs illesztés; Lemez; S-horog; Karabiner; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta spoja kraja remena: Perle; Nosač; Kopča; Karabiner; Polukružni prsten; Ušica; Uvodnica; Jezičak s čičak-trakom; Petlja; Nema pričvršćivača; Pločica; S-kuka; Karabiner; Ostalo
pl: Typ końcówki paska: Koralik; Wspornik; Klamra; Karabińczyk; Zaczep typu D-ring; Oczko; Przelotka; Zapięcie na rzep; Pętla; Bez zakończenia; Płytka; Hak typu S; Karabińczyk; Inne
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος άκρου ιμάντα: Χάντρα; Bracket; Πόρπη; Καραμπίνερ; Δακτύλιος D; Τρουκ; Ροδέλα; Καρτέλα Hook-and-loop; Βρόχος; Χωρίς τοποθέτηση; Πλάκα; Γάντζος S; Γάντζος κουμπώματος; Άλλο
lt-LT: Diržo galo jungties tipas: Karoliukas; Laikiklis; Sagtis; Karabinas; D formos žiedas; Kilpelė; Žiedas; Kabliuko ir kilpos juostelės skirtukas; Kilpa; Nėra montavimo; Plokštelė; S formos kabliukas; Greitasis kabliukas; Kita
ru: Тип концевого фитинга ремня: Валик; Кронштейн; Пряжка; Карабин; D-образное кольцо; Проушина; Люверс; Язычок с застежкой-липучкой; Петля; Без соединителя; Пластина; S-образный крючок; Карабин; Другое
nl: Type riemuiteinde-beslag: Kraal; Beugel; Gesp; Karabijnhaak; D-ring; Oogje; Oogje; Klittenbandsluiting; Lus; Zonder fitting; Plaatje; S-haak; Karabijnhaak; Overig
zh-CN: 拉带末端固定件的类型: 串珠; 支架; 带扣; 登山扣; D 形环; 金属孔; 金属扣眼; 魔术贴; 环; 无扣; 板; S 形钩; 弹簧钩; 其他
tr: Kayış ucu bağlantı tipi: Boncuk; Braket; Toka; Karabina; D halkası; Kuşgözü; Gromet; Cırt cırtlı sekme; Halka; Bağlantı aparatı yok; Plaka; S kanca; Karabina tipi kanca; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de encaixe da extremidade da alça: Conta; Suporte; Fivela; Mosquetão; Argola em D; Ilhós; Ilhó; Aba com velcro; Loop; Sem encaixe; Placa; Gancho em S; Mosquetão; Outro
sk-SK: Typ koncovky popruhu: Korálik; Konzola; Spona; Karabína; Krúžok v tvare D; Pútko; Priechodka; Zapínanie na suchý zips; Slučka; Bez kovania; Doska; Háčik v tvare S; Karabína; Iné
sv: Typ av fäste vid remmens ände: Pärla; Fäste; Spänne; Karbinhake; D-ring; Snörhål; Öljett; Kardborreband; Slinga; Utan passform; Tallrik; S-krok; Karbinhake; Annat
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrdilnega elementa na koncu traku: Biser; Nosilec; Zaponka; Vponka; D-obroč; Net; Rinke; Jeziček z ježkom; Zanka; Ni primerno za prileganje; Plošča; S-kavelj; Zaskočni kavelj; Druga
en: Strap end fitting type: Bead; Bracket; Buckle; Carabiner; D-ring; Eyelet; Grommet; Hook-and-loop tab; Loop; No fitting; Plate; S-hook; Snap hook; Other